Utah statutes.
16-4-308.   Status of shares purchased by corporation, officer, or director.
(1) (a)  Title to any shares purchased by a corporation under Section 16-4-307
vests in the corporation upon expiration of the 30-day redemption period if
the right of redemption is not exercised.
(b)  Shares purchased by a corporation under Section 16-4-307 are treated as
treasury shares and shall be held and disposed of in a manner expressly
provided for in Title 16, Chapter 10a, Utah Revised Business Corporation Act.
(c)  Any shares held by a corporation under this section are not assessable.
(d)  No dividends or distributions may be made on shares held by the
corporation.
(2) (a)  Title to any shares purchased by an officer or director of the
corporation for the officer's or director's own benefit vest in the officer or
director upon expiration of the 30-day redemption period if the right of
redemption is not exercised.
(b)  Shares purchased by an officer or director for the officer's or
director's own benefit are subject to all assessments levied by the
corporation after the assessment that was the basis for the sale at which the
officer or director purchased the shares.
